src/phonetics/text2ipa-sme.xfscript
define SecondaryLengtheningNas  p %^ m   ->  %^SL ʔ ʔ %^ m   ,
                                t %^ n   ->  %^SL ʔ ʔ %^ n   ,
                                t %^ n j ->  %^SL ʔ ʔ %^ n j ,
                                k %^ ŋ   ->  %^SL ʔ ʔ %^ n j
                                || [.#.|Cns|[Vow - [e|o]]] [Vow - á] [r|j|đ] 
                                 _ [ [i|u] [ [ Cns - j ] | .#. ] | á | a a ]  ;


! Svakt stadium (her må vi liste konsonantpara)
!Only the pairs with different phonological and orthographic representation
define WeakGrade           l b %^ b   -> l p %^ p   ,
                           l d %^ d   -> l t %^ t   ,
                           l g %^ g   -> l k %^ k   ,
                         l h k %^ k   -> l L %^ k   ,
                         l h p %^ p   -> l L %^ p   ,
                           l n %^ n j -> l ɲ %^ ɲ   ,
                         l h t %^ t   -> l L %^ t   ,
                         l h c %^ c   -> l L %^ t s ,
                         l h č %^ č   -> l L %^ t š ,
                           l z %^ z   -> l t %^ t s ,
                           l ž %^ ž   -> l t %^ t š ,

                           j b %^ b   -> j p %^ p   ,
                           j ŋ %^ ŋ   -> j n %^ n   ,
                           j g %^ g   -> j k %^ k   ,
                         j h n %^ n   -> j N %^ N   ,
                         j h k %^ k   -> j J %^ k   ,
                         j h p %^ p   -> j J %^ p   ,
                         j h m %^ m   -> j M %^ M   ,
                         j h l %^ l   -> j L %^ L   ,
                         j h t %^ t   -> j J %^ t   ,
                         j h c %^ c   -> j J %^ t s ,
                           j z %^ z   -> j t %^ t s ,
                           j d %^ d   -> j t %^ t   ,
                         j s k %^ k   -> j s %^ k   ,
                         j s t %^ t   -> j s %^ t   ,

                           r b %^ b   -> r p %^ p   ,
                           r d %^ d   -> r t %^ t   ,
                           r g %^ g   -> r k %^ k   ,
                         r h p %^ p   -> r R %^ p   ,
                           r p %^ m   -> r ʔ %^ m   ,
                           r t %^ n   -> r ʔ %^ n   ,
                           r t %^ n j -> r ʔ %^ n j   ,
                           r k %^ ŋ   -> r ʔ %^ n j   ,

                         r h k %^ k   -> r R %^ k   ,
                         r h t %^ t   -> r R %^ t   ,
                         r h c %^ c   -> r R %^ t s ,
                         r h č %^ č   -> r R %^ t š ,
                         r s t %^ t   -> r s %^ t   ,
                         r s k %^ k   -> r s %^ k   ,

                           r z %^ z   -> r t %^ t s ,
                           r ž %^ ž   -> r t %^ t š ,

                           m b %^ b   -> m p %^ p   ,
                           n d %^ d   -> n t %^ t   ,
                           n g %^ g   -> ŋ k %^ k   ,
                         m h p %^ p   -> m M %^ p   ,
                         m š k %^ k   -> m š %^ k   ,

                         n h k %^ k   -> ŋ Ŋ %^ k   ,
                         ŋ h k %^ k   -> ŋ Ŋ %^ k   ,
                         n h t %^ t   -> n N %^ t   ,
                         n h c %^ c   -> n N %^ t s ,
                         n h č %^ č   -> n N %^ t š ,
                         n s t %^ t   -> n s %^ t   ,
                         n s k %^ k   -> n s %^ k   ,

                           n z %^ z   -> n t %^ t s ,
                           n ž %^ ž   -> n t %^ t š ,

                           đ b %^ b   -> đ p %^ p   ,
                           đ g %^ g   -> đ k %^ k   ,
                           
                           v n %^ n   -> w n %^ n   ,
                           v d %^ d   -> w t %^ t   ,
                           v g %^ g   -> w k %^ k   ,
                           v j %^ j   -> w j %^ j   ,
                           v l %^ l   -> w l %^ l   ,
                         v h l %^ l   -> w L %^ L   ,
                           v r %^ r   -> w r %^ r   ,
                           v z %^ z   -> w t %^ t s ,
                           v ž %^ ž   -> w t %^ t š ,
                           v š %^ š   -> w š %^ š   ,
                           v s %^ s   -> w s %^ s   ,
                           v n %^ n j -> w ɲ %^ ɲ   ,
                         v s k %^ k   -> w s %^ k   ,
                         v s t %^ t   -> w s %^ t   ,
                         v h t %^ t   -> w W %^ t   ,
                         v h k %^ k   -> w W %^ k   ,
                         v h p %^ p   -> w W %^ p   ,
                         v h c %^ c   -> w W %^ t s ,
                         v h č %^ č   -> w W %^ t š

                   || Vow+ _ Vow ;



define HighVowelLenghtening i -> i i , u -> u u || .#. Syll (Cns) Cns* _ ( [Cns - j] ) .#. ;


define StrongNasalClusters m %^ p   -> m m %^ M p   ,
                           m %^ š k -> m m %^ š k   ,
                           n %^ t   -> n n %^ N t   ,
                           n %^ k   -> ŋ ŋ %^ Ŋ k   ,
                           n %^ c   -> n n %^ N t s ,
                           n %^ s k -> n n %^ s k   ,
                           n %^ s t -> n n %^ s t   ,
                           n %^ č   -> n n %^ N t š 
                           || Vow _ Vow ;

! Allegro former... Hva gjør vi med dem?
! Viss det er former som berre er allegro i visse delar av setninga, men ikkje
! elles, må vi ta dei som del av syntaksen på noko vis.
! Viss dei er allegro i samansetjingar må vi gå til leksikon



define VzzRule z %^ z -> d d %^ t s , 
               ž %^ ž -> d d %^ t š , 
               b %^ b -> b b %^ p   , 
               d %^ d -> d d %^ t   , 
               g %^ g -> g g %^ k   || Vow _ Vow ;
define zzRule  z %^ z ->   t %^ t s , 
               ž %^ ž ->   t %^ t š ,
               b %^ b ->   p %^ p   , 
               d %^ d ->   t %^ t   , 
               g %^ g ->   k %^ k   || Cns _ Vow ;
             ! Bled by previous

define bdgRule b -> p   , d -> t   , g -> k   || WordBorder _ Vow ;
define ptkRule p -> p h , t -> t h , k -> k h || WordBorder _ Vow ;

define VzRule   z              -> d s        , 
                ž              -> d š        || Vow [ %^ | %» ] _ Vow ;
define CttjRule č %^ č         -> h %^ t š   , 
                c %^ c         -> h %^ t s   ,
                t š %^ t š     -> h %^ t š   , 
                t s %^ t s     -> h %^ t s 
                                             || Vow Cns (h)  _ ;
define ttjRule  č %^ č         -> t %^ t š   , 
                c %^ c         -> t %^ t s   || Vow _ ;
define cRule    c              -> t s , 
                č              -> t š ;

!gávc^ci (line 367 ka:vht.tsi: -> ka:vh.tsi:
! no får vi: kɑɑvhts.tsii
!utan cRule: kɑːvhc.ciː 

define VowelLengthening e -> e e ,
                        i -> i i ,
                        o -> o o ,
                        u -> u u 
                             || .#. (Cns*) _ (h) %^ Cns Vow [Cns | .#. ] ;

define OSlashLengthening ø -> ø ø || _ ( Cns ) WordBorder ;

define VowelShortening á -> a || _ h h ; ! this should be generalised.
                                         !from aahhtšii to ahhtšii

define DiphthongShorteningIIIGr  i -> ĭ ,
                                 e -> ĕ ,
                                 u -> ŭ ,
                                 o -> ŏ 
                                        || _ [e|a|o] 
                                             [ [ h h
                                               | m m
                                               | n n
                                               | ŋ ŋ
                                               | đ đ
                                               | ɟ ɟ
                                               | l l
                                               | ʎ ʎ
                                               | s s
                                               | š š
                                               | j j
                                               | v v
                                               | Cns ə ] %^ ] ;

define DiphthongShorteningSecLng  i e -> ĭ ĕ ,
                                  e a -> ĕ ă ,
                                  u o -> ŭ ŏ ,
                                  o a -> ŏ ă 
                                             || _ Cns* %^SL ;

define DiphthongShorteningAllegro  i e -> ĭ e ,
                                   e a -> ĕ a ,
                                   u o -> ŭ o ,
                                   o a -> ŏ a 
                                              || _ Cns* %^ Cns* [e|o] ;
echo << Dialectal rules >>

!define dhRule đ -> r ; ! Moving from Karesuando to Kautokeino
!define thRule ŧ -> s ;

define eaRule a -> ä || [e|ĕ] _ ;

define backaRule a -> ɑ ;

define straRule   ɑ -> a || WordBorder s t r _ ;

define shortaRule ɑ -> a || _ h h  ;

define aaRule á -> a a || _ \[a] ;

! Latusforlenging
! How can we make this rule non-applicable after Strong grade QIII?
! Now we have pag:.ka:h, but we want pag:.kah, for <baggat>
! We need a rule for allegro shortening to block latus length in imperative
! basa: /pasa/ imperative and /pasaa/ verb genitive
define LatusLengthening   a -> a a || .#. Cns* [a|e|o|u|i] (Dummy) [ %^ Cns | QII ] _ \[a];

define PronounLenghtening u -> u u || .#. [m|t|s] _ .#. ;


! Primary stress always on first syllable:
define PrimStress [..] -> ˈ || .#. Cns* _ Vow ;

! Secondary stress:
define SecStress  [..] -> ˌ ||
                   ˈ SyllWOOnset Syll Cns*                         _ SyllWOOnset Cns* Vow    , ! gu^la^hal^lan
                   ˈ SyllWOOnset Syll Cns* ˌ SyllWOOnset Syll Cns* _ SyllWOOnset Cns* Vow    ,
 StressBorder Cns*                                                 _ SyllWOOnset Cns* Vow    ,
 StressBorder Cns* ˌ SyllWOOnset Syll Cns*                         _ SyllWOOnset Cns* Vow    , ! giel^la#gu^la^hal^la^ma
 StressBorder Cns* ˌ SyllWOOnset Syll Cns* ˌ SyllWOOnset Syll Cns* _ SyllWOOnset Cns* Vow    ,
              \[ ˈ | ˌ | Vow ] _ Diphthong Cns* (Dummy) Cns* (ə) %^ Vow , ! mielbealde -> miel#bˌealde
              \[ ˈ | ˌ | Vow ] _ Vow+ centre ;

! giella#skuvla                  -> giel^la#skuv^la       -> kˈiella#skˌuvla
! Dihtti^oalgi                   -> Diht^ti^oal^gi        -> tˈihtiˌŏɑləki
! granihtalamosiid               -> gra^nih^ta»la^mos>iid -> grˈɑ.nih.tˌɑ»lˌɑ.mosijh
! gulahallama                    -> gu^la^hal^la^ma       -> kˈulahˌallama
! hálddahuslaš                   -> háld^da»hus»laš
! borrama                        -> bor^ra^ma -> pˈo^SLrr^raa^ma
! giella#gulahallama             -> giel^la#gu^la^hal^la^ma -> kˈiella#kˌulahˌallama
! kˈiel^la#kˌu^la^hal^la^mĕä^seh -> kˈiella#kˌulahˌallamˌĕæ^seh
! gulahallameaset                -> gu^la^hal^la^mea^set -> kˈulahˌallamˌĕæseh
! ráidarasažiiddisguin           -> rái^da^ra^sa»žiid^dis^guin -> rˈájtarˌasa»dʃˌijtisguin
! giella#gulahallameaset         -> giel^la#gu^la^hal^la^mea^set -> kˈiella#kˌulahˌallamˌĕæseh
! giella#ráidarasažiiddisguin    -> giel^la#rái^da^ra^sa»žiid^dis^guin -> kˈiella#rˌájtarˌasa»dʃˌijtisguin
! ^hˌɑl^lɑ^mĕæ^seh



echo << And now we go for some OUTPUTFORMAT or another >>

! The rules above are somewhat oriented towards the orthography, and rearrange
! based upon that. Now, we might want to have output in different formats for 
! different reasons:
! SAMPA   = for the Helsinki tts engine
! IPA     = so that we may read it during development
! FINNISH = to target the fallback Bitlips demo if we are not able to meet the
!           October deadline with the generated Sámi voice.

!The idea is to comment out two of the following three rules and keep the one intended.
